Utah statutes.
53-10-203.   Missing persons -- Reports -- Notification.
(1)  Each law enforcement agency that is investigating the report of a missing
person shall provide information regarding that report to the division.  The
report shall include descriptive information and the date and location of the
last-known contact with the missing person.
(2)  The division shall notify the state registrar of Vital Statistics and the
FBI National Crime Information Center of all missing persons reported in
accordance with Subsection (1) and shall provide the state registrar with
information concerning the identity of those missing persons.
(3)  If the division has reason to believe that a missing person reported in
accordance with Subsection (1) has been enrolled in a specific school in this
state, the division shall also notify the last-known school of that report.
(4)  Upon learning of the recovery of a missing person, the division shall
notify the state registrar and any school that it has previously informed of
the person's disappearance.
(5)  The division shall, by rule, determine the manner and form of reports,
notices, and information required by this section.
(6)  Upon notification by the state registrar or school personnel that a
request for a birth certificate, school record, or other information
concerning a missing person has been made, or that an investigation is needed
in accordance with Section 53A-11-503, the division shall immediately notify
the local law enforcement authority.
